ru: Транспортные средства, запчасти и аксессуары > Запчасти и аксессуары для транспортных средств > Товары для перевозки грузов на транспортных средствах > Аксессуары для конструкций для перевозки багажа: Аксессуары для креплений для перевозки велосипедов; Аксессуары для автомобильных креплений лодок и каяков; Аксессуары для автомобильных грузовых багажников; Аксессуары для креплений для перевозки лыж и сноубордов; Аксессуары для автомобильных креплений досок для водного спорта
ja: 乗り物・パーツ > 乗り物用パーツ・関連用品 > 乗り物用収納ボックス > 車載用ラック・キャリア関連用品: 車載用サイクルキャリア関連用品; 自動車用ボート・カヤックラックアクセサリー; 自動車用カーゴラックアクセサリー; 車載用スキー・スノーボードキャリア関連用品; 自動車用ウォータースポーツボードラックアクセサリー
sk-SK: Diely pre vozidlá > Diely a príslušenstvo pre vozidlá > Riešenia uloženia nákladu na vozidle > Príslušenstvo pre nosiče motorových vozidiel: Príslušenstvo pre nosiče bicyklov; Príslušenstvo pre nosiče vozidiel, lodí a kajakov; Príslušenstvo pre strešné nosiče; Príslušenstvo pre nosiče lyží a snowboardov; Príslušenstvo na nosiče dosiek pre vodné športy
sv: Fordon och delar > Fordonsdelar och tillbehör > Lastförvaring i fordon > Tillbehör till lasthållare för fordon: Tillbehör till cykelhållare för fordon; Tillbehör för båt- och kajakhållare för fordon; Tillbehör för lasthållare för fordon; Tillbehör till skid- och snowboardräcken; Tillbehör för vattensportshållare för fordon
sl-SI: Vozila in deli > Deli in dodatki za vozila > Shranjevanje tovora in opreme v vozilih > Dodatki za nosilce za vozila: Dodatki za nosilce koles na vozilih; Dodatki za nosilce čolnov in kajakov; Dodatki za nosilce tovora na vozilih; Dodatki za nosilce za smuči in snežne deske za vozila; Dodatki za nosilce vodnih športnih desk
fr: Véhicules et accessoires > Pièces détachées pour véhicules > Accessoires de chargement > Accessoires de barre de toit pour véhicules motorisés: Accessoires de porte-vélo pour véhicules motorisés; Accessoires de porte-bateaux et porte-kayaks pour véhicules; Accessoires de porte-bagages pour véhicules; Porte-skis et porte-snowboards pour barres de toit; Accessoires de porte-planches nautiques pour véhicules
ko: 차량/부품 > 차량 부품/부대용품 > 차량 보관/화물 > 자동차용 캐리어 부대용품: 차량용 자전거 거치대 부대용품; 차량용 보트 및 카약 랙 액세서리; 차량용 카고 랙 액세서리; 차량 스키/스노보드 캐리어 부대용품; 차량용 수상 스포츠 보드 랙 액세서리
el: Οχήματα & ανταλλακτικά > Ανταλλακτικά & αξεσουάρ οχημάτων > Αποθήκευση & φορτίο οχημάτων > Αξεσουάρ ραφιών μεταφοράς μηχανοκίνητων οχημάτων: Αξεσουάρ σχαρών ποδηλάτων σε οχήματα; Αξεσουάρ σχάρας οχήματος για σκάφη και καγιάκ; Αξεσουάρ σχάρας φορτίου οχήματος; Αξεσουάρ βάσεων για σκι & snowboard σε οχήματα; Αξεσουάρ σχάρας οχήματος για σανίδες θαλάσσιων σπορ
th: รถยนต์และชิ้นส่วน > ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์สำหรับยานยนต์ > ที่จัดเก็บและบรรทุกของบนรถ > อุปกรณ์ชั้นวางของสำหรับยานพาหนะ: อุปกรณ์ชั้นวางจักรยานสำหรับรถยนต์; อุปกรณ์เสริมชั้นวางเรือและคายัคบนยานพาหนะ; อุปกรณ์เสริมชั้นวางสัมภาระบนยานพาหนะ; อุปกรณ์ที่แขวนสกียานยนต์และสโนว์บอร์ด; อุปกรณ์เสริมชั้นวางกระดานกีฬาทางน้ำบนยานพาหนะ
it: Veicoli e parti > Componenti e accessori per auto > Stoccaggio e carico per veicoli > Accessori per rastrelliere per veicoli a motore: Accessori per portabiciclette; Accessori per portabarche e portakayak per veicoli; Accessori per portapacchi da veicoli; Accessori per porta-sci e porta-snowboard per veicoli; Accessori per portatavole da sport acquatici per veicoli
pl: Pojazdy i części > Akcesoria i części do pojazdów > Przewóz i przechowywanie bagażu > Akcesoria do bagażników bazowych: Akcesoria do bagażników do przewozu rowerów; Akcesoria do bagażników na łodzie i kajaki; Akcesoria do bagażników dachowych; Akcesoria do bagażników na sprzęt narciarski i snowboardowy; Akcesoria do bagażników na deski do sportów wodnych
zh-CN: 交通工具/汽车/飞机/船舶 > 交通工具零件/配件 > 交通工具储存和载货 > 车顶架配件: 车载自行车架配件; 车载小船和皮划艇架配件; 车载储物架配件; 车顶滑雪板架配件; 车载水上运动滑板架配件
nl: Voertuigen en onderdelen > Voertuigonderdelen en -accessoires > Opslag en lading voor voertuigen > Draagrekaccessoires voor motorvoertuigen: Draagrekaccessoires voor fietsen; Accessoires voor boot- en kajakdragers voor voertuigen; Accessoires voor bagagerekken voor voertuigen; Ski- en snowboardrekaccessoires voor voertuigen; Accessoires voor watersportboarddragers voor voertuigen
fi: Ajoneuvot ja osat > Ajoneuvojen osat ja tarvikkeet > Auton säilytys- ja kuormaratkaisut > Moottoriajoneuvon tavaratelineiden lisätarvikkeet: Auton polkupyörätelineen lisätarvikkeet; Ajoneuvojen vene- ja kajakkitelineiden tarvikkeet; Ajoneuvojen tavaratelineiden tarvikkeet; Auton suksi- ja lumilautatelineiden lisätarvikkeet; Ajoneuvojen vesiurheilulautatelineiden tarvikkeet
da: Køretøjer og dele > Dele og tilbehør til køretøjer > Lagring og last til køretøjer > Tilbehør til holder til tagboks til motorkøretøjer: Tilbehør til cykelholder til køretøjer; Tilbehør til båd- og kajakstativer til køretøjer; Tilbehør til laststativer til køretøjer; Tilbehør til transportudstyr til ski og snowboard; Tilbehør til stativer til vandsportsbrætter
zh-TW: 車輛與零配件 > 車輛零件/配件 > 車輛收納空間/載貨車廂 > 汽機車攜帶架配件: 車用自行車架配件; 車用小船與獨木舟架配件; 車用載貨架配件; 車頂滑雪板架配件; 車用水上運動板架配件
bg-BG: Превозни средства и части > Автомобилни части и аксесоари > Багажници и товарни отделения за превозни средства > Аксесоари за багажник за моторни превозни средства: Аксесоари за багажник за велосипеди; Аксесоари за багажници за лодки и каяци за превозни средства; Аксесоари за товарни багажници на превозни средства; Аксесоари за багажник за ски и сноуборд; Аксесоари за багажници за водни спортни дъски за превозни средства
hr-HR: Vozila i dijelovi vozila > Dijelovi i oprema za vozila > Skladištenje i teret vozila > Dodaci za nosače za motorna vozila: Dodaci za nosače za bicikle; Dodaci za stalak za čamac za vozila i kajak; Dodaci za nosače za teret vozila; Dodatna oprema za nosače za skije i daske na vozilima; Dodaci za stalak za dasku za vodene sportove
en: Vehicles & Parts > Vehicle Parts & Accessories > Vehicle Storage & Cargo > Motor Vehicle Carrying Rack Accessories: Vehicle Bicycle Rack Accessories; Vehicle Boat & Kayak Rack Accessories; Vehicle Cargo Rack Accessories; Vehicle Ski & Snowboard Rack Accessories; Vehicle Water Sport Board Rack Accessories
cs: Vozidla a náhradní díly > Díly a příslušenství vozidel > Přeprava nákladů pomocí vozidel > Příslušenství k nosičům pro vozidla: Nosiče na jízdní kola – příslušenství; Příslušenství nosičů lodí a kajaků pro vozidla; Příslušenství k nákladním nosičům; Příslušenství na nosiče lyží a snowboardů pro vozidla; Příslušenství k nosičům na prkna pro vodní sporty
de: Fahrzeuge & Teile > Fahrzeugersatzteile & -zubehör > Stauraum- & Transportsysteme > Kfz-Gepäckträgerzubehör: Fahrradträgerzubehör; Zubehör für Kfz-Boots- & Kajakträger; Zubehör für Kfz-Gepäckträger; Ski- & Snowboardträger-Zubehör; Zubehör für Kfz-Wassersportträger
pt-PT: Veículos e peças > Acessórios e peças para veículos > Armazenamento e carga de veículos > Acessórios de suportes de carga para veículos motorizados: Acessórios de porta-bicicletas para veículos; Acessórios de suportes para barcos e caiaques em veículos; Acessórios de suportes de carga para veículos; Acessórios de suportes de esqui/snowboard para veículos; Acessórios de suporte para pranchas de desportos aquáticos em veículos
hu: Járművek és alkatrészek > Járműalkatrészek és -kiegészítők > Járműtárolás és -rakomány > Gépjárműhordozóállvány-kiegészítők: Járműkerékpárállvány-kiegészítők; Hajó- és kajaktartó kiegészítők járművekhez; Tetőcsomagtartó-kiegészítők járművekhez; Járműsí- és snowboardállvány-kiegészítők; Vízisportdeszka-tartó kiegészítők járművekhez
vi: Xe và phụ tùng > Bộ phận và phụ kiện xe cộ > Khoang lưu giữ và chở hàng của xe > Phụ kiện cho ray để đồ ở xe máy: Phụ kiện giá treo xe đạp; Phụ kiện giá đỡ thuyền và kayak cho xe; Phụ kiện giá đỡ hàng hóa trên xe; Phụ kiện giá đặt dụng cụ trượt tuyết và ván trượt trên xe; Phụ kiện giá đỡ ván thể thao dưới nước cho xe
pt-BR: Veículos e peças > Peças e acessórios de veículos > Armazenamento e carga de veículos > Acessórios para racks de transporte para veículos motorizados: Acessórios para transporte de bicicletas em veículos; Acessórios para racks de veículos para barcos e caiaques; Acessórios para racks de carga de veículos; Acessórios para racks de esqui e snowboard; Acessórios para racks de veículos para pranchas de esportes aquáticos
tr: Taşıtlar ve Parçalar > Taşıt Parçaları ve Aksesuarlar > Taşıt Saklama ve Kargo > Motorlu Taşıt Taşıma Ekipmanı Aksesuarları: Bisiklet Taşıma Aparatı Aksesuarları; Araç tekne ve kano taşıyıcı aksesuarları; Araç yük taşıyıcı aksesuarları; Taşıt Kayak ve Snowboard Rafı Aksesuarları; Araç su sporu sörf tahtası taşıyıcı aksesuarları
es: Vehículos y recambios > Piezas y accesorios para vehículos > Almacenamiento y carga de vehículos > Accesorios para portaequipajes de vehículos motorizados: Accesorios para portabicicletas para vehículos; Accesorios de vehículos para portaequipajes de botes y kayaks; Accesorios para portaequipajes de vehículos; Accesorios para portaesquíes y portatablas de snowboard para vehículos; Accesorios para portaequipajes de tablas de deportes acuáticos
nb: Kjøretøy og deler > Deler og tilbehør til kjøretøy > Billagring og -last > Lastestativtilbehør til kjøretøy: Sykkelstativtilbehør for bil; Tilbehør til takstativ for båt og kajakk; Tilbehør til takstativ for bagasje; Ski- og snowboardstativtilbehør for bil; Tilbehør til takstativ for vannsportbrett
lt-LT: Transporto priemonės ir dalys > Transporto priemonių dalys ir priedai > Transporto priemonių krovinių įranga > Motorinių transporto priemonių laikiklių priedai: Transporto priemonių dviračių laikiklių priedai; Transporto priemonių valčių ir baidarių laikiklių priedai; Transporto priemonių bagažinių priedai; Transporto priemonių slidžių ir snieglenčių laikiklių priedai; Transporto priemonių vandens sporto lentų laikiklių priedai
ro-RO: Vehicule și piese > Piese și accesorii pentru vehicule > Depozitare și încărcătură pentru vehicule > Accesorii suport transport pentru autovehicule: Accesorii suport transport pentru vehicule; Accesorii pentru suporturi de bărci și caiac pe vehicule; Accesorii pentru bare portbagaj de vehicule; Accesorii suport schiuri și plăci snowboard pentru vehicule; Accesorii pentru suporturi de plăci de sporturi nautice pe vehicule